Idaho, session 2026, H0925.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Judicial Branch the following amounts to
be expended according to the designated programs and expense classes from
the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. COURT OPERATIONS:
A. DISTRICT COURTS:
FROM:
Court Technology
Fund $2,000,000 $2,000,000
DrugCourt, MentalHealthCourtandFamilyCourtServices
Fund 0 $700,000 700,000
TOTAL $2,000,000 $700,000 $2,700,000
B. MAGISTRATE DIVISION:
FROM:
Senior Magistrate Judges
Fund $800,700 $800,700
C. COMMUNITY-BASED SUBSTANCE USE TREATMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
Substance Abuse Treatment
Fund $400,000 $400,000
DIVISION TOTAL $2,800,700 $1,100,000 $3,900,700


FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
II. GUARDIAN AD LITEM PROGRAM:
FROM:
General
Fund $165,300 $165,300
GRAND TOTAL $2,800,700 $1,265,300 $4,066,000
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.